Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Election judge; random selection. new text end new text begin A county board may, by resolution, direct the county auditor to select individuals at random from a list of all registered voters in the county to create a pool of potential election judges. The county auditor and municipal clerks in the county may designate election judges from the pool to serve on absentee ballot boards and in polling places. Election judges must meet all eligibility requirements and other qualifications established or authorized under section 204B.19. If designated, the registered voter must fulfill the obligation to serve as an election judge. County auditors and municipal clerks must not exclude a registered voter from service based upon race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or economic status. new text end